Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 16. Public Indebtedness
§ 5. Limitation on municipal, county or school district debt.

No city or town shall in any manner create any indebtedness exceeding four per cent (4%) of the assessed value of the taxable property therein, except that an additional indebtedness of four per cent (4%) of the assessed value of the taxable property therein may be created for sewage disposal systems. Indebtedness created for supplying water to cities or towns is excepted from the limitation herein.

No county shall in any manner create any indebtedness exceeding two per cent (2%) of the taxable property therein.

No school district shall in any manner create any indebtedness exceeding ten per cent (10%) on the assessed value of the taxable property therein for the purpose of acquiring land, erection, enlarging and equipping of school buildings.

All limitations herein shall refer to the last preceding general assessment. (As amended by Laws 1919, Senate Joint Resolution No. 6, p. 273; Laws 1953, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 289; Laws 1961, Senate Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 683.)

Prohibition of section. —

This section prohibits the district from creating any debt in excess of the prescribed limit. It does not per se prohibit authorization for a maximum debt which could exceed the prescribed limit. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

“Taxable property” as used herein,

does not include real property within a school district sold to county for delinquent taxes for which a certificate of purchase has been issued to the county. Williams v. School Dist., 56 Wyo. 1, 102 P.2d 48,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1940).

Applicability. —

Because any debt created by a housing authority under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-10-108

was not a general obligation and was payable only from sources other than the county's taxing authority, Wyo. Const. art. 16 §§ 3, 4, and 5 did not apply.
Gronberg v. Teton County Hous. Auth., 2011 WY 13, 247 P.3d 35,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2011).

Storm sewers. —

The 1962 amendment to this section does not exclude storm sewers from the additional bonded indebtedness allowance of 4 percent of the city's taxable property. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

A storm ditch for flood control comes within the meaning of the term “sewer,” and within the 4 percent limitation of indebtedness. Anselmi v. Rock Springs, 53 Wyo. 223, 80 P.2d 419,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1938).

Sanitary districts. —

See In re West Highway Sanitary & Improvement Dist., 77 Wyo. 384, 317 P.2d 495,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1957).

Water works indebtedness is excepted

from the constitution. Diefenderfer v. State, 13 Wyo. 387, 80 P. 667,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1905).

There is no constitutional definition of the term “school district,”

as used in this section, and nothing is contained in the constitution which is explanatory in that regard. Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

But the term was used in its ordinary sense

in this section, as it would have been understood when first used in the 1920 amendment to this section. Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

And does not include community college. —

A school district, as ordinarily understood when the 1920 amendment was adopted to this section, does not include a community college. Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

Therefore, community college districts are separate and apart from school districts. —

When the legislature authorized the establishment of community colleges and provided for community college districts, it intended such districts to be something separate and apart from a “school district,” as this term is used in this section. Goshen County Community College Dist. v. School Dist., 399 P.2d 64,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1965).

School districts not required to reach bonded indebtedness of ninety percent in order to receive state assistance. —

School districts are not required to have reached bonded indebtedness of ninety percent or more of their constitutional debt limitation imposed under art. 16, § 5, Wyo. Const., in order to receive state assistance for those capital construction projects identified in the department of education's study of school construction needs. Snell v. Johnson County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 2004 WY 19, 86 P.3d 248,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2004).

Use of bond proceeds. —

Where a portion of voted bond proceeds of a school district was available for furnishings without exceeding limit of the assessed valuation of property in the district, it can be used for purchase of furniture as authorized by statute. Hendricks v. School Dist., 44 Wyo. 204, 10 P.2d 970,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1932).

Under constitutional and statutory provisions authorizing school boards to create bonded indebtedness for the erection or enlargement of school buildings, power to use a portion of the proceeds from the bonds to purchase and install equipment necessary for its use is impliedly included, and possibility that trustees might use part of money for unlawful purposes would not invalidate bonds. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Election authorizing issue of bonds does not create debt.

Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

But debt is created when bonds are offered and sold.

Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

A debt arising from bonds is not incurred until the bonds are issued. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

Financial condition at time of issue is determinative. —

It is the financial condition of the municipality or political subdivision at the time of issue, rather than at the time of authorization, which determines whether the bonds exceed the debt limit. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

The amount of bonds which can be issued depends upon the amount of taxable property at the time the bonds are sold. Torres v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 506 P.2d 817,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 414 U.S. 990, 94 S. Ct. 342, 38 L. Ed. 2d 229, 1973 U.S. LEXIS 1185 (U.S. 1973).

Purpose in endeavoring to catalog transaction involving public entity as lease

rather than a sale is often to circumvent statutory or constitutional debt limitations, or it is to avoid statutory or constitutional restrictions on expenditures exceeding annual income.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Intent of parties is determinative

as to whether or not the transaction is a lease or a sale.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Voting at bond elections. —

A statute providing that only taxpayers may vote at bond elections was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

Statement of interest rate. —

Fact that in the proposition submitted to the electors the rate of interest was stated at four percent, and the bonds were later negotiated at three and 1/2 percent, did not affect the validity of the bonds nor the notice of election, as school trustees were justified in effecting a saving for the taxpayers if possible. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Statement of bond maturity. —

It is not necessary that the maturity of the bonds be stated in the proposition submitted to the electors. Jewett v. School Dist., 49 Wyo. 277, 54 P.2d 546,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1936).

Refunding authorized by General Obligation Public Securities Refunding Law

complies with the municipal debt limitation provisions of this section. Rodin v. State, 417 P.2d 180,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1966).

Revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which fund the city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

No application to Wyoming community development authority. —

This section and art. 16, §§ 3 and 4, Wyo. Const., are not involved with the constitutionality of the Wyoming community development authority, since under the terms of the Wyoming Community Development Authority Act, the authority is not and cannot be a political subdivision. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Quoted

in

Washakie County Sch. Dist. v. Herschler, 606 P.2d 310,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Casper Community College Dist. v. Natrona County High School Dist., 384 P.2d 319,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1963); State v. Campbell County Sch. Dist., 2001 WY 19, 19 P.3d 518,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 2001); Tavern, LLC v. Town of Alpine, 2017 WY 56, 395 P.3d 167,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administration of the General Property Tax in Wyoming,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 227.

For article, “Municipal Assistance to an Improvement District,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 180 (1957).

For comment, “Coping with Expansion: The State as Local Government Financier,” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 577 (1975).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, under state constitution and laws, of issuance by state or state agency of revenue bonds to finance or refinance construction projects at private religious-affiliated colleges or universities, 95 ALR3d 1000.

§ 6. Loan of credit; donations prohibited; works of internal improvement.

Neither the state nor any county, city, township, town, school district, or any other political subdivision, shall;

Loan or give its credit or make donations to or in aid of any individual, association or corporation, except for necessary support of the poor; or

Subscribe to or become the owner of the capital stock of any association or corporation, except that:

Funds of public employee retirement systems and the permanent funds of the state of Wyoming may be invested in such stock under conditions the legislature prescribes;

The legislature may provide by law for the investment of funds not designated as permanent funds of the state in the capital stock of any association or corporation and may designate which of these funds may be invested. The legislature may prescribe different investment conditions for each fund. Any legislation establishing or increasing the percentage of any fund that may be invested under this subparagraph shall be passed only by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of all the members of each of the two (2) houses voting separately.

The state shall not engage in any work of internal improvement unless authorized by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the people. (As amended by Laws 1984, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 323; Laws 1996, House Joint Resolution No. 5, § 1; Laws 2015, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1.)

Cross references. —

For exceptions to the last sentence of this section, see §§ 9 to 11 of this article.

For revolving investment fund, see § 12(a) of this article.

As to investment of permanent funds, see §

9-4-833

.

Amendments. —

Laws 2015, Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 3, 2016, and was proclaimed in effect November 17, 2016.

Laws 1996, House Joint Resolution No. 5, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 5, 1996, and was proclaimed in effect November 18, 1996.

Constitution does not define “political subdivision.”

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

But its concept of such entity is different from that of legislature. —

A political subdivision as visualized by the legislature is entirely different from a political subdivision as envisioned by the authors of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Political subdivision is unit of local government,

not state government. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289 (Wyo. 1978).

And must be same kind of entity as county, city, etc. —

A “political subdivision” must be an entity of the same kind or class as a county, city, township, town or school district. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289 (Wyo. 1978).

This section indicates that a county, city, township, town and school district are political subdivisions, when it uses the language, “any county, city, township, town, school district, or any other political subdivision.” Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289 (Wyo. 1978).

Restriction not applicable to agencies of government. —

This restriction is generally regarded as applicable only to private associations or corporations and not to agencies of government. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Prohibition against donations by the state cannot be nullified

by claim recipient was poor. State ex rel. McPherren v. Carter, 30 Wyo. 22, 215 P. 477,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1923).

Tax exemption. —

Lawful exemption from taxation is not “gift or donation by the state.” State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924).

Voting at bond elections. —

Statute providing that only taxpayers might vote at a bond election was unconstitutional. Simpkin v. Rock Springs, 33 Wyo. 166, 237 P. 245,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1925).

County fair board. —

Public financing of the functions of the county fair board, as authorized by §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

is not prohibited by this section. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1959).

Chapter 150, Laws 1951, codified as §§

18-9-101

to

18-9-103

, is not void because §§ 18-9-101 and

18-9-102

thereof purport to authorize the loaning of the county's credit for private purposes, in violation of this section. Board of County Comm'rs v. White, 79 Wyo. 420, 335 P.2d 433, 1959 Wyo. LEXIS 14 (Wyo. 1959).

Revolving local improvement fund. —

This section is not violated by ch. 155, Laws 1953, authorizing a municipality to set up a revolving local improvement fund from the proceeds of city or state gasoline or state cigarette license taxes, from which fund the city may annually deposit in the local improvement district fund a sum sufficient to meet the difference between the principal amount of assessments due that year and the amount of assessments actually collected that year. Banner v. Laramie, 74 Wyo. 429, 289 P.2d 922,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1955).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Reed v. Cheyenne, 429 P.2d 69,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1967); Uhls v. State, 429 P.2d 74,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1967); Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Wyoming Community Development Authority Act does not violate this section

on the ground that it constitutes lending of the public credit for a private purpose provided no debt is created in the state beyond the current year's taxes. Any private benefit would then be purely incidental and not within constitutional prohibitions. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289 (Wyo. 1978).

The plan of the Wyoming community development authority, under § 9-18-105 (xix), (xx) and (xxi) (now §

9-7-105

), to purchase secured and insured loans is not violative of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266 (Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386, 1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289 (Wyo. 1978).

Insurance of its property by school district. —

While it may be inadvisable for a school district to insure its property in a mutual company, when subject to assessments in addition to the fixed premium provided for by the policy, if ultimate liability is not greatly disproportionate to the ordinary fire insurance premium, contract does not violate the constitutional provision. Burton v. School Dist., 47 Wyo. 462, 38 P.2d 610,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1934).

Veterans' exemptions. —

Statute exempting $2,000 of property of honorably discharged war veterans and their widows and of World War nurses is not in conflict with this section. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923).

Unemployment benefits do not constitute a gratuity

but are a part of compensation or wages. Unemployment Compensation Comm'n v. Renner, 59 Wyo. 437, 143 P.2d 181,

1943 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1943).

No application where exchange of consideration between parties. —

The constitutional prohibition against a municipality lending its credit to a private corporation has no application when there is an exchange of consideration between the parties. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Fair associations. —

An act authorizing a tax by counties for aid of fair associations is void as in violation of this section. Board of County Comm'rs v. Union Pac. R.R., 25 Wyo. 463, 171 P. 668,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1918).

Joint ownership of plant by municipalities and private power companies not prohibited. —

The constitutional limitation on municipalities lending money or credit to a private entity does not prohibit a joint ownership by municipal corporations and private power companies of an electric-generating plant. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304

(Wyo. 1977).

Where participants in an electrical transmission system, including an agency organized by municipalities under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act, §§

16-1-102

through

16-1-110

, and a private corporation, entered an agreement providing, among other things, for making up deficiencies created by a defaulting participant but also that a pro rata share of the portion in system entitlements owned by the defaulter should accrue to the benefit of the other participants, such provision did not conflict with this section, prohibiting municipalities from lending money or credit to a private entity. Frank v. Cody, 572 P.2d 1106, 1977 Wyo. LEXIS 304 (Wyo. 1977).

Bond sale by corporation “on behalf of” city invalid. —

A bond sale by a nonprofit corporation “on behalf of” a city would be invalid as a loan of the city's credit in violation of this section.
"Laramie Citizens for Good Government" v. Laramie, 617 P.2d 474,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo. 1980).

Quoted

in

Miller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 79 Wyo. 502, 337 P.2d 262,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1959).

Damages award. —

District court’s damages award to a fire department shift commander did not violate Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 6, where he was not paid for hours he did not work, but was awarded damages for the breach of contract claim he proved against the city, and lost earnings and benefits were a proper component of those damages. Hanft v. City of Laramie, 2021 WY 52, 485 P.3d 369,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2021).

Cited

in

State Hwy. Comm'n v. Utah Constr. Co., 278 U.S. 194, 49 S. Ct. 104, 73 L. Ed. 262, 1929 U.S. LEXIS 6 (1929); White v. Board of County Comm'rs, 77 Wyo. 246, 313 P.2d 484,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(1957).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Municipal Assistance to an Improvement District,” see 11 Wyo. L.J. 180 (1957).

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 7. Payments of public money.

No money shall be paid out of the state treasury except upon appropriation by law and on warrant drawn by the proper officer, and no bills, claims, accounts or demands against the state, or any county or political subdivision, shall be audited, allowed or paid until a full itemized statement in writing, certified to under penalty of perjury, shall be filed with the officer or officers whose duty it may be to audit the same. (As amended by Laws 1969, House Joint Resolution No. 2, p. 491.)

Cross references. —

For provision that money shall be expended only on appropriation, see art. 3, § 35, Wyo. Const.

For provision for itemized statements to be attached to vouchers, see §

9-4-103

.

This section is of equal dignity with art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const.,

which prohibits the taking or damaging of property without just compensation. In fact, the two provisions are not in conflict. The rights afforded by art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const., are protected even though the directives of this section are complied with, since this section is no more than a regulation of the procedure by which the rights guaranteed by art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const., will be exercised. It is not a substantive limitation imposed upon such rights. Wyoming State Highway Dep't v. Napolitano, 578 P.2d 1342,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 291

(Wyo. 1978).

Claim and demand

were held to embrace all claims and demands based on a money demand. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Sufficiency of petition

to require auditor to approve warrants for attorney's compensation from specified fund should be determined in light of all laws affecting right to collect claim against state and not on ground that auditor had previously issued such warrants for 10 months. State ex rel. Watts v. Jack, 58 Wyo. 108, 125 P.2d 165,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1942).

Petition held defective. —

In an action against the state highway department on a construction contract, the petition was fatally defective where it did not show that claim was timely filed and filed with proper auditing officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Presentation of claim required. —

The presentation of claim to the proper auditing officer as required by statute is a condition precedent to the right to maintain action thereon. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Presentation to town of verified claim is necessary before commencement of action thereon against the town. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

Action on claim arising from highway construction cannot be maintained without complying with law requiring presentation of claims. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

A claim against the state highway commission, as a claim against the state, must be presented to state auditor or as directed by law and such presentation is condition to the right to sue the commission even upon contract. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Notice of claim neither signed nor verified. —

A notice of claim filed by the plaintiffs against the defendant city did not satisfy the requirements of this section and, therefore, did not begin the running of the statute of limitations contained in §

1-39-114

where the notice of claim was neither signed nor verified by the plaintiff, who declared in an affidavit that he did not prepare it and that neither he nor any member of his family furnished it to the city. Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2001 WY 33, 20 P.3d 521,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2001), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Claim filed under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., must meet the requirements of art. 16, § 7, Wyo. Const., including the requirement that it be signed by the claimant and certified to under penalty of perjury. Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Where an individual sued the city and a police officer for negligence, the individual's notice of claim, signed by the individual's attorney but not by the individual, did not meet the constitutional requirements for a valid claim under the Wyoming Governmental Claims Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-101

et seq., because it was not signed by the individual, and it was not certified to under penalty of perjury; thus, dismissal of the individual's complaint was proper despite any imprecision as to whether the district court dismissed the complaint under W.R.C.P. 12(b)(1) or W.R.C.P. 12(c). Yoak v. Ide, 2004 WY 32, 86 P.3d 872,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Where persons injured in collisions with State employees presented putative notices of claim that were neither signed by them nor certified under penalty of perjury, those notices of claim were invalid because they did not meet the requirements of Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7, and the belated attempts to cure the deficiencies were ineffective because the limitation period of the nonclaim statute had passed, thereby extinguishing the statutory right to sue the State, and the plaintiffs did not show that the deficient notices of claim were, or could be, salvaged by the savings statute, by the doctrine of equitable estoppel, or as a matter of public policy. Bell v. Schell, 2004 WY 153, 101 P.3d 465,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 197

(Wyo. 2004), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Landowners' monetary claims against a county challenging the conditional use permit application process required under the county's growth management plan should have been dismissed because the landowners failed to comply with the statutory presentment requirements under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

or Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7; the actions were not filed within the applicable two-year period, and they were not signed and certified to under penalty of perjury. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

Order dismissing plaintiffs' negligence action against a town was proper because plaintiffs presented to the town a notice of claim that did not meet the requirements of Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 7, being neither signed nor certified to under penalty of perjury. The court appropriately dismissed the action with prejudice, inasmuch as it was then impossible for plaintiffs to comply with the mandatory filing deadline of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-39-113

. Wilson v. Town of Alpine, 2005 WY 57, 111 P.3d 290,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Summary judgment for State and its snow plow operator was affirmed because the claimant failed to meet the requirement of Wyo. Const. Art. 16, § 7 to sign the written claim and certify it under penalty of perjury. He did not sign it at all; rather, it was signed by his attorney. Lavatai v. State, 2005 WY 133, 121 P.3d 121,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Notice of claim neither signed nor verified. —

District court
erred in granting summary judgment to the governmental entities and
their employees based on lack of jurisdiction because, while a personal
representative's negligence claim was neither signed under oath nor
certified, the statutory and constitutional claim requirements were
substantive, but not jurisdictional, and the entities and their employees
waived their defense by failing to properly plead an affirmative
defense
that the claim was defective. Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Claim held sufficient. —

In a contract case, a construction company fully complied with required notice requirements where a claim stated that a city caused delays by changing project specifications and failing to act to keep a project on schedule and where notice also clearly set forth damages that allegedly resulted from the city's conduct; therefore, supreme court and district court had subject matter jurisdiction to proceed with the matter presented.
City of Gillette v. Hladky Constr., Inc., 2008 WY 134, 196 P.3d 184,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2008).

Filing of claim deemed condition precedent. —

The filing of a claim on a contract with a state department with a state auditing officer is a condition precedent that cannot be waived, and, where a petition does not show that the condition has been performed, a demurrer is properly sustained. The same rule prevails in tort actions. Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978).

Dismissal where claim not verified. —

Trial court properly dismissed a medical malpractice claim against a state hospital because the notice of claim submitted to the hospital and attached to the complaint of the patient, while signed by the patient, was not certified to under penalty of perjury as required by the Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7. Jauregui v. Mem'l Hosp., 2005 WY 59, 111 P.3d 914,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. June 8, 2005), overruled in part, Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90, 331 P.3d 1174,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2014).

Worker's compensation act considered continuing appropriation. —

Because the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act is considered a continuing appropriation and the payment of claims under the Act requires no further action under the appropriation provision of the constitution, and because the Act, with the workers’ compensation ambulance provision severed from it, authorizes the payment of the claimants’ air ambulance charges in full, the severed statute is now part of the Act’s continuing appropriation, and the Office of Administrative Hearings did not order a payment without appropriation. Air Methods v. Dep't of Workforce Servs., 2018 WY 128, 432 P.3d 476,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2018).

Failure to present claim waived. —

Plaintiff's failure to present claim to town board, where not raised by demurrer or answer, was waived in an action against the town for damages resulting from changing channel of river. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

Editor's note

Martinez v. City of Cheyenne, 791 P.2d 949,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1990), overruled, Beaulieu v. Florquist, 2004 WY 31, 86 P.3d 863,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 2004).

Failure to include allegation that constitutional signature and certification requirements were met. —

District court should not have acquired jurisdiction over property owners'
inverse condemnation claim against a city under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-26-516

because owners'
complaint failed to include an allegation that the constitutional signature and certification requirements were met as required by Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7.
Gose v. City of Douglas, 2008 WY 126, 193 P.3d 1159,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2008), overruled in part, Brown v. City of Casper, 2011 WY 35, 248 P.3d 1136,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2011).

Inclusion of “under penalty of perjury.” —

Constitutional requirement that governmental claims be certified to under penalty of perjury under Wyo. Const. art. 16, § 7 was satisfied by the verified affidavit of the parents, and therefore the district court had jurisdiction over the parents' claim against the school district for their son's injuries. Cantrell v. Sweetwater County Sch. Dist. No. 2, 2006 WY 57, 133 P.3d 983,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2006).

Presumption regarding issuance of warrant. —

Where a warrant has been issued it will be presumed that the officer did not violate this section in issuing same. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Omission from statute. —

Fact that an appropriation statute does not provide expressly for the issuance of a warrant or for an audit of a claim against the state would not render such statute invalid. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923).

Omission from statute reimbursing counties for lost revenue of requirement for audit of claim does not invalidate it. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 29 Wyo. 199, 212 P. 771,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1923); Harkin v. Board of Comm'rs, 30 Wyo. 455, 222 P. 35,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 1924); State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1924).

Later enactment governing expenditure of state funds controls

manner of spending legislative appropriations, and approval of attorney's employment in sales tax division under older act could not require auditor to order payment of such attorney's salary unless authorized in appropriation act or by inclusion in budget. State ex rel. Watts v. Jack, 58 Wyo. 108, 125 P.2d 165,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1942).

Salaries. —

An act providing for a certain salary for state examiner required no special appropriation to authorize the payment. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

Statute fixing salaries of officers and enlisted men of the national guard during encampments was not continuing appropriation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Action for tort. —

It is clear from constitutional and statutory provisions that Wyoming has never given its consent that it or the state highway commission might be sued for a tort. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Veterans' exemptions. —

Under § 1, ch. 50, Laws 1921, exempting property of veterans from taxation, and providing that the county treasurers should submit to state treasurer a certified statement of exemptions, it was clearly intended that the amount payable to each county should be determined by the state treasurer, and that such certificate was sufficient compliance therewith, in view of the law, providing that the auditor need not audit claims required to be audited by other officers, and auditor should issue his warrant on certificate of the state treasurer. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Snyder, 30 Wyo. 468, 222 P. 40,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1924).

Constitution does not define “political subdivision.”

Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Amendment alleging that constitutional signature and certification requirements were met. —

District court had subject matter jurisdiction to allow amendment of a wrongful death complaint to allege presentation of a notice of claim complying with this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 1-39-113(b), which had been timely presented. The amendment related back to the original filing date in accordance with Wyo. R. Civ. P. 15(c).
Hoffman v. Darnell, 2011 WY 65, 252 P.3d 936,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2011).

But its concept of such entity is different from that of legislature. —

A political subdivision as visualized by the legislature is entirely different from a political subdivision as envisioned by the authors of the Wyoming constitution. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Political subdivision is unit of local government,

not state government. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

And must be same kind of entity as county, city, etc. —

A “political subdivision” must be an entity of the same kind or class as a county, city, township, town or school district. Witzenburger v. State, 575 P.2d 1100,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 266

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 577 P.2d 1386,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1978).

Joint powers board. —

A joint powers board is not a “political subdivision” such that it would be required to comply with the requirements of this section; a joint powers board is a “governmental entity” and therefore the requirements for §

1-39-113

for bringing a claim apply to this board. Weston County Hosp. Joint Powers Bd. v. Westates Constr. Co., 841 P.2d 841,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 1992).

Industrial Development Projects Act held constitutional. —

See Powers v. Cheyenne, 435 P.2d 448,

1967 Wyo. LEXIS 191

(Wyo. 1967), reh'g denied, 436 P.2d 961,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1968).

Applied

in

Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970); Awe v. University of Wyo., 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Hudson Oil Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 49 Wyo. 1, 52 P.2d 683,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1935); State v. Underwood, 54 Wyo. 1, 86 P.2d 707,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(1939).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For case note, “Filing of Claims Against the State: Is ‘Almost’ Good Enough? Rissler & McMurry Co. v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 582 P.2d 583,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 214

(Wyo. 1978),” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 259 (1979).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Amount of appropriation as limitation on damages for breach of contract recoverable by one contracting with government agency, 40 ALR4th 998.

Persons or entities upon whom notice of injury or claim against state or state agencies may or must be served, 45 ALR5th 173.